Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.220

Prohibition on use of contributions for a different office. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a candidate for public office or the candidate's authorized committee may not use or permit the use of contributions, whether or not surplus, solicited for or received by the candidate or the candidate's authorized committee to further the candidacy of the individual for an office other than the office designated on the statement of organization. A contribution solicited for or received on behalf of the candidate is considered solicited or received for the candidacy for which the individual is then a candidate if the contribution is solicited or received before the general election for which the candidate is a nominee or is unopposed.

(2) With the written approval of the contributor, a candidate or the candidate's authorized committee may use or permit the use of contributions, whether or not surplus, solicited for or received by the candidate or the candidate's authorized committee from that contributor to further the candidacy of the individual for an office other than the office designated on the statement of organization. If the contributor does not approve the use of his or her contribution to further the candidacy of the individual for an office other than the office designated on the statement of organization at the time of the contribution, the contribution must be considered surplus funds and disposed of in accordance with RCW 29B.40.090.

[ 2024 c 164 s 464; 2010 c 204 s 612; 1995 c 397 s 27; 1993 c 2 s 19 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.490, 42.17.790.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.